test/src/morphology/V-umblw_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - umblõ: # Verb 58 'eng /est õmmelda/fin' - full paradigm
     umblõ+V+Inf: umblõ
     umblõ+V+Ger: umblõs
     umblõ+V+Sup: umblõm
     umblõ+V+Sup+Ine: umblõmõs
     umblõ+V+Sup+Ela: umblõmõst
     umblõ+V+Sup+Tra: umblõmõks
     umblõ+V+Sup+Abe: umblõmõt
     umblõ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: umblõb
     umblõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: umblõt
     umblõ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: umblõbõd
     umblõ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: umbliz
     umblõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [umblizt, umbliztõ]
     umblõ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [umblizt, umbliztõ]
     umblõ+V+Ind+ConNeg+Sg: umblõ
     umblõ+V+Cond+Sg3: umblõks
     umblõ+V+Imprt+Sg2: umbõl
     umblõ+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: umbõl
     umblõ+V+Imprt+Pl2: umblõgid
     umblõ+V+Jus+Sg3: umblõg
     umblõ+V+Quo+Sg3: umbliji
     umblõ+V+ActPrfPrc: umblõn
     umblõ+V+PssPrfPrc: umbõltõd
